Washington statutes.
RCW 24.36.090

Merger, consolidation of associations authorized—Procedure.

Any two or more associations may be merged into one such constituent association or consolidated into a new association. Such merger or consolidation shall be made in the manner prescribed by RCW 23B.07.050 and *chapter 23B.11 RCW for domestic corporations.

[ 1991 c 72 s 46; 1983 c 3 s 28; 1959 c 312 s 9.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 23B.11 RCW was repealed in its entirety by 2024 c 22 s 13. For later enactment, see chapter 23B.11A RCW.